Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2515
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the citizens of Nebraska benefit by participation in national efforts to take innovative action to provide lead analysis of our children and the environment in which they are cared for, live, and learn.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 16.